Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-730
State Capitol Restoration Fund; created; investment.

The State Capitol Restoration Fund is created. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1131, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB323, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.